zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 婴幼儿食品 > 婴儿配方奶粉: 乳制品配方奶粉; 低过敏配方奶粉; 无乳糖配方奶粉; 大豆配方奶粉
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Alimenti per bebè e bambini > Alimenti per bambini: Formula (latte); Formula ipoallergenica; Formula senza lattosio; Formula (base soia)
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Maistas kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Mišinukai kūdikiams: Pieno mišinukai; Hipoalerginiai mišinukai; Mišinukai be laktozės; Sojų mišinukai
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > ベビーフード・離乳食 > 粉ミルク: 粉ミルク（乳製品）; 低アレルギー性粉ミルク; ラクトースフリーの粉ミルク; 大豆粉ミルク
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Alimente pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Lapte praf pentru bebeluși: Lapte praf pe bază de produse lactate; Lapte praf hipoalergenic; Lapte praf fără lactoză; Lapte praf pe bază de soia
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Baby og småbørn – mad > Baby – modermælkserstatning: Modermælkserstatning med komælk; Hypoallergen modermælkserstatning; Laktosefri modermælkserstatning; Modermælkserstatning med soja
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Jedzenie dla dzieci i niemowląt > Mleko w proszku dla niemowląt: Mleko modyfikowane dla niemowląt; Hipoalergiczne mleko modyfikowane dla niemowląt; Bezlaktozowe mleko modyfikowane; Sojowe mleko modyfikowane dla niemowląt
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 嬰幼兒食品 > 配方奶粉: 配方奶; 低過敏性配方; 無乳糖配方; 配方豆漿
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 영유아식 > 유아 분유: 우유 분유; 저알레르기 분유; 락토프리 분유; 대두 분유
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Baby & Toddler Food > Baby Formula: Dairy Formula; Hypoallergenic Formula; Lactose-Free Formula; Soy Formula
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Đồ ăn cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Sữa công thức cho trẻ sơ sinh: Sữa bò công thức; Sữa công thức không gây dị ứng; Sữa công thức không chứa lactose; Sữa đậu nành công thức
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Hrana za dojenčke in malčke > Adaptirano mleko;: Mlečne formule; Hipoalergeno adaptirano mleko; Adaptirano mleko brez laktoze; Adaptirano mleko iz soje
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Comida para bebés y niños > Fórmula infantil: Fórmula láctea; Fórmula hipoalergénica; Fórmula sin lactosa; Fórmula de soja
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Mat för baby och småbarn > Bröstmjölksersättning: Mjölkersättning; Hypoallergen mjölkersättning; Laktosfri mjölkersättning; Sojabaserad mjölkersättning
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Nahrung für Babys & Kleinkinder > Milchnahrung: Kuhmilchnahrung; Hypoallergene Milchnahrung; Laktosefreie Milchnahrung; Sojamilchnahrung
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Baba- és csecsemőétel > Babatápszer: Tejtermék-tápszer; Hipoallergén tápszer; Laktózmentes tápszer; Szójatápszer
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Vauvan ja leikki-ikäisen ruoka > Maidonkorvike: Maidonkorvikkeet; Hypoallergeeniset korvikkeet; Laktoosittomat krovikkeet; Soijakorvikkeet
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Comida para bebé e criança > Fórmulas para bebé: Fórmulas com lactose; Fórmula hipoalergénica; Fórmula sem lactose; Fórmulas com soja
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Hrana za bebe i malu djecu > Adaptirano mlijeko za dojenčad: Mliječna formula; Hipoalergena formula; Formula bez laktoze; Sojina formula
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Храна за бебета и малки деца > Адаптирани млека: Млечни адаптирани млека; Хипоалергенни адаптирани млека; Адаптирани млека без лактоза; Соеви адаптирани млека
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Gıdaları > Bebek Devam Sütleri: Devam Sütleri; Hipoalerjenik Devam Sütleri; Laktoz İçermeyen Devam Sütleri; Soya Devam Sütleri
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Voeding voor baby's en peuters > Melkpoeder voor baby's: Zuivelmelkpoeder; Hypoallergeen melkpoeder; Lactosevrij melkpoeder; Sojamelkpoeder
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Продукты питания для детей и младенцев > Детские смеси: Молочные смеси; Гипоаллергенные смеси; Безлактозные смеси; Соевые смеси
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > อาหารทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อาหารนมสำหรับทารก: สูตรนม; สูตรลดการเกิดอาการแพ้; สูตรปราศจากแลคโตส; สูตรถั่วเหลือง
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Mat for baby og barn > Morsmelkerstatning: Melkebasert morsmelkerstatning; Hypoallergenisk morsmelkerstatning; Laktosefri morsmelkerstatning; Soyabasert morsmelkerstatning
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Βρεφική & παιδική τροφή > Βρεφικό γάλα: Βρεφικό γάλα με βάση το αγελαδινό γάλα; Υποαλλεργικό βρεφικό γάλα; Γάλα χωρίς λακτόζη; Βρεφικό γάλα σόγιας
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Comida para bebês > Fórmula para bebês: Fórmula láctea; Fórmula hipoalergênica; Fórmula sem lactose; Fórmula de soja
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Dětská a kojenecká strava > Kojenecká mléka: Kojenecké mléko s laktózou; Kojenecké hypoalergenní mléko; Kojenecké mléko bez laktózy; Sójové kojenecké mléko
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Dojčenské príkrmy > Dojčenské mlieko: Dojčenské mlieko; Hypoalergénne mlieko; Mlieko bez laktózy; Sójové mlieko
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Nourriture pour bébés et tout-petits > Lait en poudre pour bébés: Formule laitière; Formule hypoallergénique; Formule sans lactose; Formule au soja